Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.130

Disposition of moneys.

All fees and other moneys received by the department under this chapter shall be paid to the director and used solely for the purpose of carrying out this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter. All civil fines received by the courts as the result of notices of infractions issued by the director shall be paid to the director, less any mandatory court costs and assessments.

[ 2003 c 395 s 2; 1993 sp.s. c 24 s 929; 1986 c 178 s 8; 1973 c 142 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 182 s 7; 1959 c 139 s 13.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—1993 sp.s. c 24: See notes following RCW 28A.310.020.